Wisconsin, session 2025, AB955.
do enact as follows:AB955,1Section 1. 18.03 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:18.03 (2) (b) The commission may interpret the statutes enforced or administered by it as it considers to be necessary to effectuate the purpose of the statutes. The authority granted by this paragraph shall not exceed the authority granted by s. 227.11 (2) (a).AB955,2Section 2. 227.10 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:227.10 (2m) No agency may implement or enforce any standard, requirement, or threshold, including as a term or condition of any license issued by the agency, unless that standard, requirement, or threshold is explicitly and specifically required or explicitly and specifically permitted by statute or by a rule that has been promulgated in accordance with this subchapter, except as provided in s. 186.118 (2) (c) and (3) (b) 3. The governor, by executive order, may prescribe guidelines to ensure that rules are promulgated in compliance with this subchapter.AB955,3Section 3. 227.11 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:227.11 (1m) No agency may promulgate rules interpreting the provisions of any statute enforced or administered by the agency without explicit and specific statutory authority.AB955,4Section 4. 227.11 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is repealed.AB955,5Section 5. 227.11 (2) (a) 1. to 3. of the statutes are renumbered 227.11 (4) to (6), and 227.11 (4) and (5), as renumbered, are amended to read:227.11 (4) A statutory or nonstatutory provision containing a statement or declaration of legislative intent, purpose, findings, or policy does not confer rule-making authority on the agency or augment the agency’s rule-making authority beyond the rule-making authority that is explicitly and specifically conferred on the agency by the legislature.(5) A statutory provision describing the agency’s general powers or duties does not confer rule-making authority on the agency or augment the agency’s rule-making authority beyond the rule-making authority that is explicitly and specifically conferred on the agency by the legislature.AB955,6Section 6. 227.11 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:227.11 (2) (d) An agency may promulgate rules implementing or interpreting a statute that it will enforce or administer after publication of the authorizing statute but prior to the statute’s effective date. A rule promulgated under this paragraph may not take effect prior to the effective date of the authorizing statute that it implements or interprets.AB955,7Section 7. 227.11 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:227.11 (3) (a) A plan that is submitted to the federal government for the purpose of complying with a requirement of federal law does not confer rule-making authority and cannot be used by an agency as authority to promulgate rules. No agency may agree to promulgate a rule as a component of a compliance plan unless the agency has explicit and specific statutory authority to promulgate the rule at the time the compliance plan is submitted.(b) A settlement agreement, consent decree, or court order does not confer rule-making authority and cannot be used by an agency as authority to promulgate rules. No agency may agree to promulgate a rule as a term in any settlement agreement, consent decree, or stipulated order of a court unless the agency has explicit and specific statutory authority to promulgate the rule at the time the settlement agreement, consent decree, or stipulated order of a court is executed.AB955,8Section 8. 227.135 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:227.135 (2) An agency that has prepared a statement of the scope of the proposed rule shall present the statement to the department of administration, which shall make a determination as to whether the agency has the explicit and specific authority to promulgate the rule as proposed in the statement of scope and shall report the statement of scope and its determination to the governor who, in his or her discretion, may approve or reject the statement of scope. The agency may not send the statement to the legislative reference bureau for publication under sub. (3) until the governor issues a written notice of approval of the statement. The agency shall also present the statement to the individual or body with policy-making powers over the subject matter of the proposed rule for approval. The individual or body with policy-making powers may not approve the statement until at least 10 days after publication of the statement under sub. (3) and, if a preliminary public hearing and comment period are held by the agency under s. 227.136, until the individual or body has received and reviewed any public comments and feedback received from the agency under s. 227.136 (5). No state employee or official may perform any activity in connection with the drafting of a proposed rule, except for an activity necessary to prepare the statement of the scope of the proposed rule until the governor and the individual or body with policy-making powers over the subject matter of the proposed rule approve the statement. This subsection does not prohibit an agency from performing an activity necessary to prepare a petition and proposed rule for submission under s. 227.26 (4). Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab955 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab955 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB955 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB955 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB955: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting